Arkansas, session 2025, HB1452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-71-219 is amended to read as follows:
5-71-219. Unlawful use and transport of medical marijuana.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Cultivation facility” means the same as defined in the
Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 98;
(2) “Dispensary” means the same as defined in the Arkansas
Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98;
(3) “Medical marijuana” means marijuana lawfully possessed,
transported, or used for a medical use under state law; and
(4) “Medical use” means the same as defined in the Arkansas
Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98.
*CEB084*
02-26-2025 10:07:51 CEB084

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1452
(b) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly:
(1) Use medical marijuana through inhalation in a place
prohibited under the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 98;
(2)(1) Transport medical marijuana in an amount greater than
five ounces (5 oz.) unless the person is a licensed transporter, is employed
by a cultivation facility or dispensary licensed by the Medical Marijuana
Commission, and is in possession of a valid registration identification card
issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division; or
(3)(2) Transport medical marijuana from another state into
Arkansas.
(c) A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 71, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
5-71-231. Unlawful use of medical marijuana.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Medical marijuana” means marijuana lawfully possessed,
transported, or used for medical use under state law;
(2) "Smoke" means to inhale, exhale, or burn lighted combustible
plant material; and
(3) "Vapor inhalation" means breathing in the vapor of medical
marijuana created by an e-cigarette, as defined in § 6-60-803(2).
(b)(1) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly use medical marijuana
through vapor inhalation in a place prohibited under the Arkansas Medical
Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, including:
(A) On a school bus;
(B) On the grounds of a daycare center, preschool, primary
or secondary school, college, or university;
(C) At a drug or alcohol treatment facility;
(D) At a community or recreation center;
(E) In a correctional facility;
(F) On any form of public transportation;
(G) In a public place as defined in § 20-27-1803(11); or
(H) On any property that is under control of the Arkansas
National Guard or the United States military.
02-26-2025 10:07:51 CEB084

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1452
(2) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly smoke medical
marijuana in a place prohibited under the Arkansas Medical Marijuana
Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98, including:
(A) In a place where smoking tobacco is prohibited by law;
(B) In the presence of a person who is under fourteen (14)
years of age;
(C) Inside a motor vehicle, aircraft, motorized
watercraft, or any vehicle drawn by power other than muscle power;
(D) Knowingly in the presence of a pregnant woman; or
(E) In a place where the smoking of marijuana for medical
use is likely to cause another person not authorized to use marijuana to be
under the influence of marijuana.
(c) Unlawful use of medical marijuana is a Class C misdemeanor.

5-71-232. Possession of uncontained medical marijuana in a motor
vehicle.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Medical marijuana” means marijuana lawfully possessed,
transported, or used for medical use under state law;
(2) "Smoking" means inhaling, exhaling, or burning lighted
combustible plant material; and
(3) "Uncontained" means not contained in a jar, bag, wrapping or
other container obtained from a dispensary licensed under the Arkansas
Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 98.
(b) It is unlawful for a person to possess uncontained medical
marijuana in a motor vehicle that is located on a public highway or the
right-of-way of a public highway if:
(1) The medical marijuana is in a form that can be readily used
through smoking; and
(2) The medical marijuana is within an area of the motor vehicle
that is readily accessible to the driver in a seated position.
(c) Possession of uncontained medical marijuana in a motor vehicle is
a Class C misdemeanor.
/s/Lundstrum


02-26-2025 10:07:51 CEB084